Wisconsin, session 2025, SB628.
do enact as follows:SB628,11Section 1. 283.90 of the statutes is created to read:SB628,2,122283.90 Notification of exceedances. (1) Whenever on the basis of any 3information available to it the department finds that there has been a exceedance of 4any groundwater protection standards under ch. 160 or of any standard for PFAS, 5as defined in s. 299.48 (1) (b), in a proposed or promulgated rule of the department, 6the department shall notify the county health department, tribal health 7department, and county land and conservation department in the affected county 8and the county health department, tribal health department, and county land and 9conservation department in any adjacent county that the department determines 10may be negatively affected as a result of the exceedance. The department shall 11provide notice within 7 business days after verifying that an exceedance has 12occurred. The notice is subject to public inspection and copying under s. 19.35 (1).SB628,2,1513(2) The department shall create and maintain a notification system for 14notifying county health departments, tribal health departments, and county land 15and conservation departments of the exceedances described in this section.SB628,2,1716(3) The department may establish procedures for providing notice under this 17section.SB628,218Section 2. Effective date.SB628,2,2019(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after 20publication.SB628,2,2121